lexc/verb/enhuigek.lexc
LEXICON Case1oeml
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^i       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeo2§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeo2§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo2§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeo2§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeo2§tt§igea§t§igea§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeo2§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeo2§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeo2§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeo2§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeo2§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeo2§tt§igeaa§t§igea§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeo2§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igea§l§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeo2§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


! káromol:károml
LEXICON AddVerboml
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoml;

LEXICON Repoml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
                    Case1oml;


LEXICON Case1oml
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
!+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^i       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
!+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
!+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeo§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igea§l§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igea§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerboe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoe;

LEXICON Repoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^nöm #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^nöd #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^nötök #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoe;
                    Imper1oe;

LEXICON Imperoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrepoe2;
LEXICON Imper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrep1oe;

LEXICON Nrepoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;
LEXICON Nrepoe2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;

LEXICON Nrep1oe
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImper1oe;

LEXICON NImperoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;
LEXICON NImperoe2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Potoe2;

LEXICON NImper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Potoe;
                      Pot1oe;

LEXICON Potoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Caseoe;
LEXICON Potoe2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Caseoe;

LEXICON Pot1oe
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoe;
             Case1oe; ! case1 if differs

LEXICON Verb
agyongyötör AddVerboe;
búvárol:búvárl AddVerboml;
csőröl AddVerboe;
csűröl AddVerboe;
eszközöl AddVerboe;
gyötör AddVerboe;
gátol:gátl AddVerboml;
javasol:javasl AddVerboml;
káromol:károml AddVerboml;
kárpótol:kárpótl AddVerboml;
kóborol:kóborl AddVerboml;
köcsögöl AddVerboe;
könyököl AddVerboe;
közöl AddVerboe;
lovagol:lovagl AddVerboml;
miskárol:miskárl AddVerboml;
mángorol:mángorl AddVerboml;
mérnököl AddVerboe;
mészárol:mészárl AddVerboml;
orvosol:orvosl AddVerboml;
ostromol:ostroml AddVerboml;
panaszol:panaszl AddVerboml;
pazarol:pazarl AddVerboml;
porol:porl AddVerboml;
párol:párl AddVerboml;
pótol:pótl AddVerboml;
pöröl AddVerboe;
töröl AddVerboe;
udvarol:udvarl AddVerboml;
vásárol:vásárl AddVerboml;
védnököl AddVerboe;
ócsárol:ócsárl AddVerboml;
ülnököl AddVerboe;
őröl AddVerboe;
